Hawaii, session 2025, SB1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 321-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§321-10  Rules, adoption, effect[.]; adoption of federal regulations.  (a)  All rules and regulations adopted or made by the department of health shall be adopted or made in conformity with chapter 91.  They shall have the force and effect of law. (b)  The department of health may adopt, by rule, any federal regulation as it existed on January 1, 2025, in the area of protecting, preserving, caring for, and improving the physical and mental health of the people of the State that it deems to be in the public interest." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________